District of Columbia statutes.
31-3408

Repealed

Annual report.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 9, 44 DCR 818
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 501(a)(3), 46 DCR 1294
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-252, § 2(d), 50 DCR 225
Application of D.C. Law 12-274: Section 501(b) of D.C. Law 12-274 provided that this section shall apply upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to § 32-574.1 § 44-304.01, (2001 Ed.).
1981 Ed., § 35-4508.